New York, session 2025-2026, S9180.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Legislative intent. The creation and evolution of local 2 governments in this state has constituted a vital part of the state's 3 political and social historical development. Local governments have 4 provided a strong basis for local pride and identification, yet fiscal 5 and other needs may call for consolidation of the corporate structures. 6 Procedures for consolidation should allow local initiative and implemen- 7 tation of the consolidation and should recognize and provide a mechanism 8 for continuing local identification with governmental antecedents. 9 Hamlets, which delineate geographic areas within the new government 10 structure but without separate governmental powers, will provide this 11 mechanism for retention of local identification with traditional govern- 12 mental entities. 13 § 2. Section 750 of the general municipal law is amended by adding a 14 new subdivision 19 to read as follows: 15 19. "Hamlet" shall mean a geographic designation within the surviving 16 local government which may identify a constituent local government's 17 former boundaries for purposes of local place name identification. 18 § 3. Paragraphs (l) and (m) of subdivision 2 of section 752 of the 19 general municipal law, as added by chapter 74 of the laws of 2009, are 20 amended and a new paragraph (n) is added to read as follows: 21 (l) the effective date of the proposed consolidation; [and] 22 (m) the time and place or places for the public hearing or hearings on 23 such proposed joint consolidation agreement pursuant to section seven 24 hundred fifty-four of this title[.]; and 25 (n) a plan to maintain the names and geographic areas designated as 26 hamlets of the surviving local government, if any. 27 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13700-01-5